Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2324
County funds; county treasurer; duty to secure best terms possible.

It is hereby made the duty of the county treasurer to use all reasonable and proper means to secure to the county the best terms for the depositing of the money belonging to the county consistent with the safekeeping and prompt payment of the funds of the county when demanded.

Laws 1891, c. 50, § 9, p. 353;

R.S.1913, § 6663;

C.S.1922, § 6194;

C.S.1929, § 77-2511;

R.S.1943, § 77-2324.

Drainage district is entitled to interest obtained by county from fund in hands of treasurer as ex officio treasurer of district. Nemaha Valley Drainage District No. 2 v. Nemaha County, 100 Neb. 64, 158 N.W. 438 (1916).